Utah statutes.
53A-11-101.7.   Truancy -- Notice of truancy -- Failure to cooperate with school authorities -- Habitual truant citation.

(1)  Except as provided in Section 53A-11-102 or 53A-11-102.5, a school-age minor who is enrolled in a public school shall attend the public school in which the school-age minor is enrolled.

(2)  A local school board, local charter board, or school district may impose administrative penalties on a school-age minor who is truant.

(3)  A local school board or local charter board:

(a)  may authorize a school administrator, a designee of a school administrator, a law enforcement officer acting as a school resource officer, or a truancy specialist to issue notices of truancy to school-age minors who are at least 12 years old; and

(b)  shall establish a procedure for a school-age minor, or the school-age minor's parents, to contest a notice of truancy.

(4)  The notice of truancy described in Subsection (3):

(a)  may not be issued until the school-age minor has been truant at least five times during the school year;

(b)  may not be issued to a school-age minor who is less than 12 years old;

(c)  may not be issued to a minor exempt from school attendance as provided in Section 53A-11-102 or 53A-11-102.5;

(d)  shall direct the school-age minor and the parent of the school-age minor to:

(i)  meet with school authorities to discuss the school-age minor's truancies; and

(ii)  cooperate with the school board, local charter board, or school district in securing regular attendance by the school-age minor; and

(e)  shall be mailed to, or served on, the school-age minor's parent.

(5)  A habitual truant citation may be issued to a habitual truant if:

(a)  the local school board, local charter board, or school district has made reasonable efforts, under Section 53A-11-103, to resolve the school attendance problems of the habitual truant; and

(b)  the efforts to resolve the school attendance problems, described in Subsection (5)(a), have not been successful.

(6)  A habitual truant to whom a habitual truant citation is issued under Subsection (5):

(a)  shall be referred to the juvenile court for violation of Subsection (1); and

(b)  is subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.

(7)  A notice of truancy or a habitual truant citation may only be issued by:

(a)  a school administrator, or a truancy specialist, who is authorized by a local school board or local charter board;

(b)  a designee of a school administrator described in Subsection (7)(a); or

(c)  a law enforcement officer acting as a school resource officer.

(8)  Nothing in this part prohibits a local school board, local charter board, or school district from taking action to resolve a truancy problem with a school-age minor who has been truant less than five times, provided that the action does not conflict with the requirements of this part.

(9)  Nothing in this part allows a local school board or charter school governing board to issue a citation pursuant to this section if the minor is exempt from school attendance as provided in Section 53A-11-102 or 53A-11-102.5.

